de: Backflocken-Form: Stückchen; Buttons; Chunks; Tropfen; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Häppchen; Standard; Stäbchen; Plättchen; Sonstige
ro-RO: Formă chipsuri pentru copt: Bucățele; Bănuți; Bucăți mari; Picături; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Bucățele mici; Standard; Batoane; Discuri; Altele
nb: Bakeform for chip: Biter; Knapper; Store biter; Dråper; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Biter; Standard; Pinner; Skiver; Annet
pl: Forma kawałków do pieczenia: Kawałeczki; Pastylki; Kawałki; Krople; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Drobne kawałki; Standardowe; Pałeczki; Talarki; Inne
lt-LT: Konditerijos šokolado gabalėlių forma: Gabalėliai; Sagutės; Stambūs gabalėliai; Lašeliai; Milžiniški; Mikro; Mini; Trupiniuoti gabaliukai; Standartiniai; Lazdelės; Plokštelės; Kita
hu: chip: Darabok; Gombok; Nagyobb darabok; Cseppek; Óriás; Mikro; Mini; Szemcsék; Normál; Pálcikák; Pasztillák; Egyéb
ja: ベーキングチップ形状: ビッツ; ボタン; チャンク; ドロップ; ジャンボ; マイクロ; ミニ; モーセル; 標準; スティック; ウェハー; その他
zh-CN: 烘培装饰原料形态: 碎粒; 纽扣状; 块状; 滴状; 巨型; 微型; 迷你; 碎块; 标准; 条状; 威化状; 其他
ru: Форма капель: Крошка; Капли-пуговицы; Крупные кусочки; Капли; Джамбо; Микро; Мини; Маленькие кусочки; Стандартные; Палочки; Пластинки; Другое
en: Baking chip form: Bits; Buttons; Chunks; Drops; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Morsels; Standard; Sticks; Wafers; Other
vi: Hình dạng vụn bánh quy: Mảnh vụn; Hình nút áo; Dạng khối nhỏ; Hình giọt nước; Khổng lồ; Siêu nhỏ; Mini; Viên nhỏ; Tiêu chuẩn; Dạng que; Dạng đồng xu; Khác
it: Forma di chip da forno: Pezzetti; Bottoni; Pezzettoni; Gocce; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Bocconcini; Standard; Bastoncini; Cialde; Altro
nl: Bakchip vorm: Stukjes; Buttons; Brokken; Druppels; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Brokjes; Standaard; Staafjes; Schijfjes; Overig
hr-HR: Oblik čokoladnih komadića za pečenje: Komadići; Gumbi; Komadi; Kapljice; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Sitni komadići; Standardno; Štapići; Diskovi; Ostalo
bg-BG: Форма на шоколадовите капки: Парченца; Копчета; Едри парчета; Капки; Джъмбо; Микро; Мини; Малки парченца; Стандартни; Пръчици; Дискове; Друго
pt-PT: Formato das pepitas de pastelaria: Pedaços; Botões; Pedaços grandes; Gotas; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Pepitas; Padrão; Palitos; Discos; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika čipsa za peko: Koščki; Gumbki; Večji koščki; Kapljice; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Drobni koščki (morsels); Standardno; Palčke; Oblati; Drugo
sv: Bakform för chips: Bitar; Knappar; Stora bitar; Droppar; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Småbitar; Standard; Stavar; Pastiller; Övrigt
fr: Format des pépites de cuisson: Éclats; Boutons; Morceaux; Gouttes; Géant; Micro; Mini; Pépites; Standard; Bâtonnets; Palets; Autre
pt-BR: Formato dos chips para assar: Pedaços pequenos; Botões; Pedaços; Gotas; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Pedaços pequenos; Padrão; Palitos; Discos; Outro
el: Μορφή baking chip: Κομματάκια; Κουμπιά; Χοντρά κομμάτια; Σταγόνες; Jumbo; Micro; Μίνι; Μπουκιές; Κανονικά; Μπαστουνάκια; Δίσκοι; Άλλο
th: รูปแบบช็อกโกแลตชิปสำหรับการอบ: เกล็ด; ชิ้นกระดุม; ชิ้นใหญ่; หยด; จัมโบ้; ไมโคร; มินิ; ชิ้นเล็ก; มาตรฐาน; แท่ง; แผ่นเวเฟอร์; อื่นๆ
tr: Pasta/süsleme çikolatası formu: Kırık; Düğme; Parça; Damla; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Ufak parça; Standart; Çubuk; Pul; Diğer
fi: Leivontahippujen muoto: Palaset; Napit; Lohkareet; Pisarat; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Nokareet; Vakio; Tikut; Kiekot; Muu
cs: Tvar kousků na pečení: Kousky; Pecičky; Kusy; Kapky; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Kousíčky; Standardní; Tyčinky; Penízky; Jiné
es: Forma de virutas de horneado: Trocitos; Botones; Trozos grandes; Gotas; Jumbo; Micro; Mini; Bocaditos; Estándar; Palitos; Obleas; Otro
ko: 베이킹 칩 형태: 비트; 버튼; 청크; 드롭; 점보; 마이크로; 미니; 모셀; 표준; 스틱; 웨이퍼; 기타
da: Bagechips' form: Stykker; Knapper; Store stykker; Dråber; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Små stykker; Standard; Stænger; Wafers; Andet
sk-SK: Pekáč na pečenie hranoliek: Kúsky; Peniažky; Kúsky (chunks); Kvapky; Jumbo; Mikro; Mini; Malé kúsky; Štandardný; Tyčinky; Okrúhle plátky; Iný
zh-TW: 烘焙用巧克力豆形式: 碎片; 鈕扣狀; 塊狀; 滴狀; 巨大; 微型; 迷你; 碎粒; 標準; 條狀; 圓片狀; 其他